Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 2. Virginia Voter Registration System.
§ 24.2-406.
Lists of persons voting at elections.

The Department of Elections shall furnish, at a reasonable price, lists of persons who voted at any primary, special, or general election held in the four preceding years to (i) candidates for election or political party nomination to further their candidacy, (ii) political party committees or officials thereof for political purposes only, (iii) political action committees that have filed a current statement of organization with the Department of Elections pursuant to §

24.2-949.2

or with the Federal Elections Commission pursuant to federal law, for political purposes only, (iv) incumbent officeholders to report to their constituents, and (v) members of the public or a nonprofit organization seeking to promote voter participation and registration by means of a communication or mailing without intimidation or pressure exerted on the recipient, for that purpose only. Such lists shall be furnished to no one else and shall be used only for campaign and political purposes and for reporting to constituents. Unless such lists are not available due to a pending recount or election contest, the general registrar shall submit the list of persons who voted to the Department of Elections within 14 days after each election. The general registrars of localities using nonelectronic pollbooks shall submit the list of persons who voted to the Department of Elections within seven days after the pollbooks are released from the possession of the clerk of court. The Department of Elections shall make available such lists no later than seven days after receiving them from the general registrar.

The Department of Elections shall furnish to the Chief Election Officer of another state, on request and at a reasonable price, lists of persons who voted at any primary, special, or general election held for the four preceding years. Such lists shall be used only for the purpose of maintenance of voter registration systems and shall be transmitted in accordance with security policies approved by the State Board of Elections.

In no event shall any list furnished under this section contain the social security number, or any part thereof, of any registered voter, except for a list furnished to the Chief Election Officer of another state permitted to use social security numbers, or any parts thereof, that provides for the use of such numbers on applications for voter registration in accordance with federal law, for maintenance of voter registration systems.

Any list furnished under this section shall contain the post office box address in lieu of the residence street address for any individual who has furnished at the time of registration or subsequently, in addition to his street address, a post office box address pursuant to subsection B of §

24.2-418

.

History.

1970, c. 462, § 24.1-23; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 119; 1972, c. 620; 1973, c. 30; 1974, cc. 369, 428; 1975, c. 515; 1976, c. 616; 1978, c. 778; 1983, c. 348; 1993, cc. 144, 641; 1994, c. 250; 1995, c. 314; 1996, c. 251; 2001, cc. 612, 626; 2003, c. 1015; 2004, cc. 184, 410; 2007, c. 318; 2009, c. 318; 2012, c. 664; 2013, c. 446; 2015, c. 712; 2016, cc. 18, 492.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 144 amended former § 24.1-23, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 1993, c. 641, cl. 6, effect has been given in this section, as set out above. In accordance with c. 144, the amendment added the second paragraph.

Acts 2004, c. 410, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act affecting uniformed and overseas voters as defined in the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act (42 U.S.C. § 1973ff [now 52 USC § 20301] et seq.) shall be applicable to any Federal Post Card Application received from such voter after November 4, 2003.”

Acts 2015, ch. 712, cl. 1 amended subsection A by, among other things, adding “unless such lists are not available due to a pending recount or election contest” at the end of the third sentence. As that language is a duplication of language already in the sentence, the sentence has been set out without the language at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by cc. 612 and 626 are identical, and substituted “located in the Commonwealth” for “for his residence” near the end of the third and fourth paragraphs, and substituted “issued by or under the authority of any court of competent jurisdiction, including but not limited to courts of the Commonwealth of Virginia” for “as described in §§ 16.1-253.1, 16.1-253.4, 16.1-279.1, and

18.2-60.3

” in the fourth paragraph.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015, in the first sentence of the first paragraph, inserted “special” and substituted “four preceding” for “two preceding.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 184 deleted “printed precinct” preceding “list furnished” near the beginning in the fourth paragraph and added the last paragraph.

The 2004 amendment by c. 410, effective April 12, 2004, deleted “printed precinct” preceding “list furnished” near the beginning in the fourth paragraph.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 318 added the A through F designations; added subsection B and inserted “or any part thereof” following “number” and exception at the end of subsection C.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 318, in subsection D, substituted “individual” for “active or retired law-enforcement officer, as defined in §

9.1-101

and in 5 U.S.C. § 8331(20) but excluding officers whose duties relate to detention as defined in paragraphs (A) through (D) of § 8331(20)” and “pursuant to subsection B of §

24.2-418

” for “located in the Commonwealth for use on such lists”; and deleted subsections E and F.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 664 rewrote subsection A, which formerly read: “The State Board shall furnish to candidates, elected officials, or political party chairmen and to no one else, on request and at a reasonable price, lists for their districts of persons who voted at any primary, special, or general election held in the four preceding years. Such lists shall be used only for campaign and political purposes and for reporting to constituents.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 446 added the last two sentences in subsection A.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 712 substituted “Department of Elections” for “State Board” and “State Board of Elections” throughout the section; in subsection A, substituted “14 days” for “60 days,” and added the fourth sentence.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 18 and 492 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “general registrar” for “electoral board” in the third and last sentences, and substituted “general registrars” for “electoral boards” in the fourth sentence.

Law Review.

For annual survey of Virginia law article, “Election Law,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 181 (2012).

§ 24.2-407.
Statement for persons receiving lists of persons registered or voting; penalties.

Any person receiving lists pursuant to §

24.2-405

,

24.2-406

,

24.2-706

, or

24.2-710

shall sign the following statement:

“I understand that the lists requested are the property of the State Board of Elections of the Commonwealth of Virginia, and I hereby state or agree, subject to felony penalties for making false statements pursuant to §

24.2-1016

, that (i) I am a person authorized by §

24.2-405

,

24.2-406

,

24.2-706

, or

24.2-710

of the Code of Virginia to receive a copy of the lists described; (ii) the lists will be used only for the purposes prescribed and for no other use; and (iii) I will not permit the use or copying of the lists by persons not authorized by the Code of Virginia to obtain them.

Signature of Purchaser .”

Click to view

History.

1970, c. 462, § 24.1-23; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 119; 1972, c. 620; 1973, c. 30; 1974, cc. 369, 428; 1975, c. 515; 1976, c. 616; 1978, c. 778; 1983, c. 348; 1993, c. 641; 2010, c. 812.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 812 substituted “§

24.2-405

,

24.2-406

,

24.2-706

, or

24.2-710

” for “§

24.2-405

or §

24.2-406

” twice.

§ 24.2-407.1.
Prohibition on disclosure of social security numbers or parts thereof.

It shall be unlawful for any person who has obtained, under §

24.2-405

or

24.2-406

or any prior law, a list of persons registered or voting which contained social security numbers, or any parts thereof, to disclose any voter’s social security number, or any part thereof, to any other person. Any person maintaining a system containing social security numbers, or any parts thereof, obtained from the Board or the Department of Elections shall delete or destroy the portion of his records containing those numbers, except for a list furnished to a court of the Commonwealth or of the United States for jury selection purposes, a commissioner of the revenue, as defined in §

58.1-3100

, or a treasurer, as defined in §

58.1-3123

, for tax assessment, collection, and enforcement purposes, or the Chief Election Officer of another state, permitted to use social security numbers, or any parts thereof, that provides for the use of such numbers on applications for voter registration in accordance with federal law, for the purpose of matching voter registration lists.

History.

1994, c. 656; 2007, c. 318; 2010, c. 452; 2015, c. 712.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 318 deleted the section symbol preceding “24.2-406”, inserted “or any parts thereof” following “numbers” in the first sentence and in the second sentence inserted “or any part thereof” following “number” and added the exception at the end of the paragraph.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 452 inserted “a commissioner of the revenue, as defined in §

58.1-3100

, or a treasurer, as defined in §

58.1-3123

, for tax assessment, collection, and enforcement purposes.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 712 inserted “or the Department of Elections” in the second sentence.

§ 24.2-408.
State Registrar of Vital Records to transmit weekly lists of decedents to Department of Elections.

The State Registrar of Vital Records shall transmit to the Department of Elections by electronic means a weekly list of all persons 17 years of age or older who have died in the Commonwealth subsequent to its previous weekly list. The lists shall be in a format specified by the Department and shall contain the deceased’s name; address; county, city, or town of residence; social security number, if any; and date and place of his birth and of his death. The Department shall maintain a permanent record of the information in the lists as part of the voter registration system, and the general registrars shall use the information in the lists to carry out their duties pursuant to §

24.2-427

. Information in the lists shall be confidential and consistent with the requirements of §

32.1-271

.

History.

1970, c. 462, § 24.1-25; 1972, c. 620; 1975, c. 515; 1993, c. 641; 1999, c. 117; 2015, c. 740; 2022, cc. 4, 28.

The 1999 amendment,

effective April 1, 2000, in the first sentence, substituted “transmit to the State Board by electronic means a monthly list” for “furnish the State Board a monthly report” and substituted “list” for “report” following “previous monthly”; substituted “lists shall be in a format specified by the State Board and” for “reports” in the second sentence; rewrote the former third sentence which read: “The Board shall transmit the information from the reports to the appropriate general registrars,” and added the last sentence.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 740 substituted “Department of Elections” for “State Board” in the first sentence, “Department” for “State Board” in the second sentence and “Department” for “Board” in the third sentence.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 4 and 28 are identical, and in the first sentence, substituted “weekly” for “monthly” twice and “17 years of age or older who have died” for “of the age of seventeen years or more who shall have died”; and in the current last sentence (former last two sentences), substituted “system, and the general registrars shall use” for “system. The general registrars shall have access to.”

§ 24.2-409.
Central Criminal Records Exchange to transmit lists of felony convictions to Department of Elections.

The Central Criminal Records Exchange shall transmit to the Department of Elections by electronic means (i) a monthly list of all persons convicted of a felony during the preceding month and (ii) an annual list of all persons who have been convicted of a felony, regardless of when the conviction occurred. The list shall be in a format mutually agreed upon by the Commissioner of Elections and the Department of State Police and shall contain the convicted person’s name; address; county, city, or town of residence; social security number, if any; date and place of birth; and date of conviction. The Department shall maintain a permanent record of the information in the lists as part of the voter registration system. Upon receipt of the monthly list, the Department shall compare, on a monthly basis, the contents of the list to the list of all registered voters maintained on the voter registration system and shall notify the appropriate general registrar of the felony conviction of any registered voter. Upon receipt of the annual list, the Department shall compare the contents of the list to the list of all registered voters maintained on the voter registration system and shall notify the appropriate general registrar of the felony conviction of any registered voter. The general registrars shall have access to the information in the lists to carry out their duties pursuant to §

24.2-427

.

History.

1970, c. 462, § 24.1-26; 1972, c. 620; 1975, c. 515; 1993, c. 641; 1999, c. 117; 2013, c. 491; 2015, c. 740.

The 1999 amendment,

effective April 1, 2000, substituted “transmit to the State Board by electronic means a monthly” for “furnish monthly to the State Board a complete” in the first sentence, inserted “shall be in a format specified by the State Board and” in the second sentence, rewrote the third sentence which formerly read: “The Board shall transmit the information from the list to the appropriate general registrars,” and added the last sentence.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 491, in the first sentence, deleted “Division of” following “The” at the beginning, inserted the clause (i) designator and clause (ii); in the second sentence, substituted “mutually agreed upon” for “specified” and inserted “and the Department of State Police,” and added the fourth and fifth sentences.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 740 substituted “Department” for “Board” throughout the section, “Department of Elections” for “State Board” in the first sentence, and “Commissioner of Elections” for “State Board” in the second sentence.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Election Law and Government,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 119 (2011).

§ 24.2-409.1.
Department of Elections to transmit information pertaining to persons convicted of a felony in federal court.

Upon receipt of a notice of a felony conviction sent by a United States attorney pursuant to the National Voter Registration Act (52 U.S.C. § 20501 et seq.), the Department shall notify the appropriate general registrar of the conviction.

History.

1996, cc. 72, 73; 2015, c. 740.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “52 U.S.C. § 20501 et seq.” was substituted for “42 U.S.C. § 1973gg et seq.” to conform to the editorial reclassification of Title 52, U.S.C., effective September 1, 2014.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 740 substituted “Department” for “State Board.”

§ 24.2-410.
Clerks of circuit courts to furnish lists of certain adjudications.

The clerk of each circuit court shall furnish monthly to the Department of Elections a complete list of all persons adjudicated incapacitated pursuant to Chapter 20 (§

64.2-2000

et seq.) of Title 64.2 or whose incapacity has been recognized pursuant to §

64.2-2115

, and therefore “mentally incompetent” for purposes of this title unless the court order specifically provides otherwise, during the preceding month or a statement that no adjudications have occurred that month. The list shall contain each such person’s name; address; county, city, or town of residence; social security number, if any; date and place of birth; and date of adjudication. The Commissioner of Elections and the Executive Secretary shall determine the procedure for furnishing such lists, which may be by electronic means. The Department shall transmit the information from the list to the appropriate general registrars.

History.

1976, c. 616, § 24.1-26.1; 1993, c. 641; 1998, c. 582; 2011, c. 518; 2015, c. 740.

Cross references.

As to indexing of findings of incapacity or restoration by clerk, see §

64.2-2014

.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the references to “Chapter 10 (§

37.2-1000

et seq.) of Title 37.2”
and “§ 37.2-1047,” respectively, were changed to “Chapter 20 (§

64.2-2000

et seq.) of Title 64.2”
and “§

64.2-2115

,” respectively, to conform to the recodification of Title 64.1 and Chapter 10 of Title 37.2 by Acts 2012, c. 614, effective October 1, 2012.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 518 inserted “or whose incapacity has been recognized pursuant to § 37.2-1047” in the first sentence.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 740 substituted “Department of Elections” for “State Board” in the first sentence, added the third sentence, and substituted “Department” for “Board” in the fourth sentence.

§ 24.2-410.1.
Citizenship status; Department of Motor Vehicles to furnish lists of noncitizens.

The Department of Motor Vehicles shall include on the application for any document, or renewal thereof, issued pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 3 (§

46.2-300

et seq.) of Title 46.2 a statement asking the applicant if he is a United States citizen. Information on citizenship status shall not be a determinative factor for the issuance of any document pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 3 (§

46.2-300

et seq.) of Title 46.2.The Department of Motor Vehicles shall furnish monthly to the Department of Elections a complete list of all persons who have indicated a noncitizen status to the Department of Motor Vehicles in obtaining any document, or renewal thereof, issued pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 3 (§ 46.2-300 et seq.) of Title 46.2. The Department of Elections shall transmit the information from the list to the appropriate general registrars. Information in the lists shall be confidential and available only for official use by the Department of Elections and general registrars.

For the purposes of this section, the Department of Motor Vehicles is not responsible for verifying the claim of any applicant who indicates United States citizen status when applying for any document, or renewal thereof, issued pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 3 (§

46.2-300

et seq.) of Title 46.2.

History.

2006, cc. 926, 940; 2015, c. 740; 2020, cc. 908, 909, 1227, 1246.

Cross references.

As to electronic transfer of information in Department of Motor Vehicles records for voter registration purposes, see §

46.2-208.1

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, cc. 926 and 940, cls. 2, provide: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2007.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1227 and 1246, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1227 and 1246, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 854 of the Acts of Assembly of 2019 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 740 added “of Motor Vehicles” following “Department” in the second sentence of subsection A and in the first sentences of subsections B and C; and substituted “Department of Elections” for “State Board” and “Board” throughout subsection B.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 908 and 909 are identical, and in subsection A in the first paragraph, substituted “Title 46.2 a statement asking the applicant if he is a United States citizen” for “Title 46.2, as a predicate to offering a voter registration application pursuant to §

24.2-411.1

, a statement asking the applicant if he is a United States citizen. If the applicant indicates a noncitizen status, the Department of Motor Vehicles shall not offer that applicant the opportunity to apply for voter registration. If the applicant indicates that he is a United States citizen and that he wishes to register to vote or change his voter registration address, the statement that he is a United States citizen shall become part of the voter registration application offered to the applicant”; in the second paragraph, substituted “The” for “Additionally, the” in the first sentence; redesignated subsection B as the second paragraph of subsection A and redesignated subsection C as subsection B.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1227 and 1246, effective January 1, 2021, are identical, and substituted “any document” for “a driver’s license, commercial driver’s license, temporary driver’s permit, learner’s permit, motorcycle learner’s permit, special identification card” in the first sentence of subsections A and B, and in subsection C.

§ 24.2-410.2.
Security of the Virginia voter registration system.

The State Board shall promulgate regulations and standards necessary to ensure the security and integrity of the Virginia voter registration system and the supporting technologies utilized by the counties and cities to maintain and record registrant information. The State Board shall, in consultation with representatives of local government information technology professionals and general registrars, update the security standards at least annually. Such review shall be completed by November 30 each year.

The electoral board of each county and city that utilizes supporting technologies to maintain and record registrant information shall develop and annually update written plans and procedures to ensure the security and integrity of those supporting technologies. All plans and procedures shall be in compliance with the security standards established by the State Board pursuant to subsection A. Each electoral board shall report annually by March 1 to the Department of Elections on its security plans and procedures. The general registrar and the Department of Elections shall provide assistance to the electoral board, upon request by the electoral board.

In accordance with the process prescribed by the State Board, the Department of Elections may limit access to the Virginia voter registration system by any county or city that has failed to comply with the provisions of subsection B or the security standards established by the State Board pursuant to subsection A. Such access shall be limited as necessary in order to address and resolve any security risks or to enforce compliance with the provisions of subsection B or the security standards established by the State Board. Prior to restricting access to Virginia voter registration system by any county or city, the Department of Elections shall provide notice to the county or city of the failure to comply with the provisions of subsection A or B and the county or city shall have seven days to correct any deficiencies. The Department of Elections may provide technical assistance to any county or city upon request by the county or city.

Records of the State Board or of a local electoral board, to the extent such records describe protocols for maintaining the security of the Virginia voter registration system and the supporting technologies utilized to maintain and record registrant information, the release of which would compromise the security of the Virginia voter registration system, shall be confidential and excluded from inspection and copying under the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.).

The State Board or a local electoral board may hold a closed meeting pursuant to the provisions of the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.) for the purpose of discussing protocols for maintaining the security of the Virginia voter registration system and the supporting technologies utilized to maintain and record registrant information, where discussion of such matters in open meeting would compromise the security of the Virginia voter registration system. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to authorize a closed meeting to discuss any breach of security of the Virginia voter registration system.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the release of information concerning any breach of security of the Virginia voter registration system.

History.

2019, c. 426.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 426, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Board of Elections shall convene a work group prior to adopting standards prescribed by §

24.2-410.2

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act. Such work group shall consist of representatives from counties and cities, selected in consultation with the Virginia Association of Counties, the Virginia Municipal League, and the Virginia Association of Local Government Information Technology Executives. The representatives selected shall include representatives from both rural and urban localities and localities of varying population sizes. At least one staff member of the Joint Legislative Audit and Review Commission, designated by the Director of the Joint Legislative Audit and Review Commission, shall also serve on this work group. Such work group shall review proposed standards and develop general cost estimates for implementation of such security standards pursuant to this act.”

Acts 2019, c. 426, cl. 3 provides: “That the Department of Elections shall establish a standing advisory group of local government information technology professionals and general registrars to provide assistance to the State Board of Elections and consult on emerging security concerns and updates to annual security standards pursuant to subsection A of §

24.2-410.2

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act.”